Hawaii statutes.
[§342G-14] Powers and duties of the office
of solid waste management. The office shall:

(1) Promote the development of coordinated statewide
solid waste management;

(2) Identify and monitor environmental and public
health issues relating to solid waste management;

(3) Promote source reduction, recycling, and
bioconversion, including home composting, through the provision of a
comprehensive, innovative, and effective statewide public education and
awareness program concerning the value of source reduction and recycling, and
the way the public can participate in these areas;

(4) Comply with the federal Resource Conservation and
Recovery Act of 1976 (42 United States Code section 6901 et seq.) and any other
federal law heretofore or hereafter enacted affecting solid waste;

(5) Seek compliance with sections 226-18, 226-52, and
226-103;

(6) Assess the feasibility of employing disposal
fees, including fees at the point of introduction or sale of any product that
would require eventual disposition as solid waste, as possible funding sources
for waste management activities;

(7) Coordinate with the department of land and
natural resources to incorporate solid waste management and processing concerns
in the department of land and natural resources’ land use planning and
development efforts;

(8) Coordinate the bioconversion efforts of
appropriate agency and county activities, including the provision of technical
assistance and the evaluation of bioconversion programs;

(9) Provide waste evaluation services and assistance
in developing paper recycling and other materials programs to both the public
and private sector, where feasible;

(10) Promote the use of enterprise zones in each
county to support source reduction, recycling, and bioconversion-type
businesses;

(11) Create and maintain a database to assess the
composition of the State’s waste stream. If feasible, this database shall
contain the information necessary to generate the office’s annual report;

(12) Identify and apply for appropriate federal funds to
support the programs and activities authorized by this chapter; and

(13) Cooperate with appropriate federal, state, and
county agencies in carrying out the office’s responsibilities under this
chapter. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next